Vermont, session 2025-2026, S195.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4820 is amended to read:
§ 4820. HEARING REGARDING COMMITMENT
* * *
(b) When a person is found to be incompetent to stand trial, has not been
indicted by reason of insanity for the alleged offense, or has been acquitted by
reason of insanity at the time of the alleged offense, the person shall be entitled
to have counsel appointed from Vermont Legal Aid the Office of the Defender
General to represent the person. The Department of Mental Health and, if
VT LEG #385820 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.195
2026 Page 2 of 3
applicable, the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living
shall be entitled to appear and call witnesses at the proceeding.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 7618 is amended to read:
§ 7618. ORDER; NONHOSPITALIZATION
(a) If the court finds that a treatment program other than hospitalization is
adequate to meet the person’s treatment needs, the court shall order the person
to receive whatever treatment other than hospitalization is appropriate for a
period of 90 days. If the treatment plan proposed by the Commissioner is for a
secure residential recovery facility or a psychiatric residential treatment facility
for youth, the court may at any time, on its own motion or on a motion of an
interested party, review the need for treatment at the secure residential
recovery facility or the psychiatric residential treatment facility for youth,
respectively.
(b) If at any time during the specified period it comes to the attention of the
court either that the patient is not complying with the order or that the
alternative treatment has not been adequate to meet the patient’s treatment
needs, the court may, after proper hearing:
(1) consider other alternatives, modify its original order, revoke its
original order, and direct the patient to undergo another program of alternative
treatment for the remainder of the 90-day period; or
VT LEG #385820 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.195
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2) enter a new order directing that the patient be hospitalized for the
remainder of the 90-day period.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385820 v.1